en: Cooked lamb brains
fr: Cervelles d'agneau cuites
hr: kuhani janjeći mozak
it: cervella di agnello cotta

en: lamb hearts
fr: Coeurs d'agneau
hr: janjeća srca
it: cuori di agnello
pl: serca cielęce

en: Cooked lamb hearts
fr: Coeurs d'agneau cuits
hr: kuhana janjeća srca
it: cuori di agnello cotti

en: lamb livers
fr: Foies d'agneau
hr: janjeća jetra
it: fegatini di agnello

en: Cooked lamb livers
fr: Foies d'agneau cuits
hr: kuhane janjeće jetrice
it: fegatini di agnello cotti

en: lamb kidneys
de: Lammnieren
es: Riñones de cordero
fr: Rognons d'agneau
hr: janjeći bubrezi
it: rognoni di agnello

en: Braised lamb kidneys
fr: Rognons d'agneau braisés
hr: pirjani janjeći bubrezi
it: rognoni di agnello brasati

en: lamb sweetbread
fr: Ris d'agneau
hr: janjeći slatki kruh
it: animelle di agnello

en: Cooked lamb sweetbread
fr: Ris d'agneau cuit
hr: kuhani janjeći slatki kruh
it: animelle di agnello cotte

en: lamb leg
fr: Gigot d'agneau
hr: janjeći but
it: coscia di agnello

en: Pan-fried lamb leg
fr: Gigot d'agneau poêlé
hr: janjeći but pečen u tavi

en: Grilled lamb leg
fr: Gigot d'agneau grillé
hr: janjeći but na žaru
it: coscia di agnello alla griglia

en: Braised lamb leg
fr: Gigot d'agneau braisé
hr: dinstani janjeći but
it: coscia di agnello brasata

en: Roasted lamb leg, Baked lamb leg
fr: Gigot d'agneau rôti au four, Gigot d'agneau cuit au four
hr: pečeni janjeći but
it: coscia di agnello arrosto

en: lamb neck
fr: Collier d'agneau
hr: janjeći vrat
it: collo di agnello

en: Braised lamb neck
fr: Collier d'agneau braisé
hr: dinstani janjeći vrat
it: collo di agnello brasato

en: Boiled lamb neck
fr: Collier d'agneau bouilli
hr: kuhani janjeći vrat
it: collo di agnello bollito

en: lamb rib, Raw lamb rib chop
fr: Côte d'agneau première crue
hr: janjeće rebro
it: costolette di agnello

en: Chop grilled lamb rib
fr: Côte première d'agneau grillée
hr: nasjeckajte janjeća rebra na žaru
it: costolette di agnello grigliate

en: Pan-fried lamb rib
fr: Côte première d'agneau poêlée
hr: janjeća rebra u tavi